New York, session 2025-2026, A5304.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 137 of the correction law is amended by adding a 2 new subdivision 7 to read as follows: 3 7. The department's office of special investigations shall send a 4 representative of such office in-person to confirm any reported incident 5 of bodily injury or harm to an incarcerated individual no later than 6 five days after receiving such report. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08473-01-5